Maryland, session 2026, SB0391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
10–312.
(f) (1) Except as provided in [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of this
subsection, before the county makes any disposition, grant, or lease of county property, the
county shall publish notice of the disposition, grant, or lease once a week for 3 successive
weeks in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the county and shall include the
terms and the compensation to be received and give opportunity for objections.
(2) A county may grant an easement for a public utility without giving
notice under this subsection.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0391*

SENATE BILL 391
(3) DORCHESTER COUNTY MAY ENTER INTO A LEASE OF COUNTY
PROPERTY WITHOUT GIVING NOTICE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IF THE LEASE HAS A
TERM OF 5 YEARS OR LESS AND AN ANNUAL RENT OF NOT GREATER THAN $750.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.